New York, session 2025-2026, A10322.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The mental hygiene law is amended by adding a new section 2 16.39 to read as follows: 3 § 16.39 Residential transition conferences. 4 (a) For the purposes of this section, "covered operator" shall mean 5 any holder of an operating certificate issued pursuant to this article 6 that provides residential services, any organization providing residen- 7 tial services whose incorporation or activities require the approval of 8 the commissioner, or any program funded or administered by the office 9 that provides residential services. 10 (b) It shall be the duty of every covered operator to provide written 11 notice of pending placement to interested parties, in accordance with 12 guidelines promulgated by the office. Interested parties shall include, 13 but not be limited to: 14 (1) the covered operator who currently serves a person with develop- 15 mental disabilities; 16 (2) the covered operator who will serve such person with developmental 17 disabilities after the transition; 18 (3) the person with developmental disabilities who is entering or 19 leaving such residential program; 20 (4) the person with developmental disabilities' family, unless such 21 person objects to their family's attendance; 22 (5) the person with developmental disabilities' guardian or legal 23 representative; and 24 (6) the person with developmental disabilities' care manager. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13418-02-6 A. 10322--A 2 1 (c) (1) The purpose of the written notice shall be to provide inter- 2 ested parties with sufficient information about the proposed placement, 3 reason for the placement, information about scheduling or declining a 4 residential transition conference, the process for responding to the 5 notice, and any other relevant information as determined by the office 6 and the covered operator. 7 (2) A residential transition conference shall be held between the 8 interested parties after notice has been given of the proposed placement 9 to discuss the proposal. 10 (3) The office may establish rules and regulations for the provision 11 of written notice to interested parties and the administration of a 12 residential transition conference, including that such conference may 13 take place virtually or over the phone. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 15 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 16 ment, and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the imple- 17 mentation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made 18 and completed on or before such effective date.